Colorado, session 2026A, HB1126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-401, amend (1);
and add (3.5), (5.4), (5.7), and (7) as follows:
18-12-401. Definitions.
As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Dealer" means:
(a) A federally licensed firearm dealer as defined in section
18-12-101; and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Any other federal firearms licensee who, within the scope of the
licensee's license, sells firearms at retail to the public OR TRANSFERS
FIREARMS TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC AS PART OF A RETAIL TRANSACTION,
INCLUDING A SALE OR TRANSFER CONDUCTED BY THE LICENSEE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 18-12-112, 18-12-112.5, OR 18-12-506.
(3.5) (a) "EMPLOYEE" MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A DEALER WHO, IN
THE COURSE OF THE EMPLOYEE'S DUTIES, HANDLES FIREARMS; PROCESSES
THE SALE, LOAN, OR TRANSFER OF FIREARMS; OR OTHERWISE HAS ACCESS TO
FIREARMS UNDER THE DEALER'S CONTROL.
(b) "EMPLOYEE" INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING AN
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR UNDER THE TERMS OF A CONTRACT WITH A
DEALER, WHO ENGAGES IN THE CONDUCT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3.5)(a)
OF THIS SECTION, WHETHER PAID OR UNPAID.
(c) "EMPLOYEE" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT
HAVE AUTHORITY TO UNLOCK THE DEALER'S FIREARM STORAGE ROOMS,
CONTAINERS, CASES, OR OTHER DEVICES USED TO SECURE THE DEALER'S
FIREARMS IN A MANNER THAT PREVENTS UNAUTHORIZED USE OF THE
FIREARMS.
(5.4) "LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 18-12-301.
(5.7) "RESPONSIBLE PERSON" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN 27
CFR 478.11.
(7) "TRANSFER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
24-33.5-424 (1)(d).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-401.5, amend
(1)(a), (3), and (7)(a)(II); and add (7.5) as follows:
18-12-401.5. Permit required - issuing agency - cash fund -
inspections - penalty - report - rules - repeal.
(1) (a) Beginning July 1, 2025, Every dealer must obtain a state
permit in order to engage in the business of dealing in firearms other than
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

destructive devices in this state OR TO TRANSFER FIREARMS OTHER THAN
DESTRUCTIVE DEVICES INTO OR OUT OF THIS STATE.
(3) In order FOR A DEALER to be issued a state permit: a dealer must:
(a) THE DEALER MUST hold a valid federal firearms license;
(b) THE DEALER AND EACH RESPONSIBLE PERSON OF THE DEALER
MUST not have had a license or permit to sell, lease, transfer, purchase, or
possess a firearm or ammunition from the federal government, any state, or
a subdivision of any state, revoked, suspended, or denied for good cause
within three years before submitting an application; and
(c) A DEALER AND EACH RESPONSIBLE PERSON OF THE DEALER MUST
not have been convicted for a violation of any provision of this article 12;
any Colorado or any other state's law concerning the possession, purchase,
or sale of firearms; or any federal law concerning the possession or sale of
firearms in the three years before submitting an application for a state
permit.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, if the
department finds that a dealer failed to post the required notice or make a
report concerning unlawful purchases in violation of section 18-12-111;
failed to make a record required pursuant to section 18-12-402; transferred
a firearm without a locking device or failed to post the required notice
concerning locking devices, in violation of section 18-12-405; failed to
comply with any of the requirements of section 18-12-406; failed to comply
with any of the requirements of section 29-11.7-105 (5); violated any other
provision of this article 12 or any other state or local law concerning the
sale of firearms; or violated any federal law or rule concerning the sale of
firearms or firearm components for which the penalty includes potential
revocation of the person's federal firearms license, the department shall:
(II) For a second or subsequent offense:
(A) Issue a warning to the dealer that includes a description of the
offense and the penalty for subsequent offenses;
(B) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE COMMITTED ON OR
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, IMPOSE A FINE OF UP TO SEVENTY-FIVE THOUSAND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

DOLLARS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7.5) OF THIS SECTION;
(B) (C) Suspend the dealer's state permit for a period of time
determined by the department; or
(C) (D) Revoke the dealer's state permit.
(7.5) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES GOVERNING THE
IMPOSITION OF FINES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION. THE RULES MUST INCLUDE CATEGORIES OF VIOLATIONS BASED ON
THE SEVERITY OF THE OFFENSE, FINE RANGES ASSOCIATED WITH EACH
CATEGORY, AND AGGRAVATING AND MITIGATING FACTORS THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL CONSIDER WHEN DETERMINING FINE AMOUNTS.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT ALL FINES COLLECTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT
THE MONEY TO THE FIREARM DEALER PERMIT CASH FUND CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-12-402 as
follows:
18-12-402. Retail dealers - record - inspection.
(1) Every individual, firm, or corporation DEALER engaged, within
this state, in the retail TRANSACTIONS, INCLUDING THE sale, rental, or
exchange, OR TRANSFER, of firearms pistols, or revolvers OTHER THAN
DESTRUCTIVE DEVICES shall keep a record of each pistol or revolver sold,
rented, or exchanged at retail FIREARM TRANSACTION CONDUCTED BY THE
DEALER, OTHER THAN TRANSACTIONS SOLELY INVOLVING DESTRUCTIVE
DEVICES. The record must be made at the time of the transaction in a book
OR ELECTRONIC RECORD kept for that purpose. and
(2) THE RECORD REQUIRED IN THIS SECTION must include:
(a) The name of the person to whom the pistol or revolver is sold or
rented or with whom exchanged; his or her THAT RECEIVED THE FIREARM
AND THE RECIPIENT'S age occupation, residence, and, if residing in a city,
the street and number therein where he or she resides AND ADDRESS;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

(b) The make, caliber, and finish of said pistol or revolver, together
with its THE FIREARM;
(c) THE FIREARM'S number and serial letter, if any;
(d) The date of the sale, rental, or exchange of said pistol or revolver
TRANSACTION; and
(e) The name of the employee or other person making such sale,
rental, or exchange THAT CONDUCTED THE TRANSACTION.
(3) The record book shall be open DEALER SHALL MAKE THE
RECORDS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION AVAILABLE at all times to the FOR
inspection of any BY A duly authorized police PEACE officer.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT AND ANY OTHER STATE AGENCY SHALL NOT
USE THE INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM DEALER RECORDS TO CREATE OR
MAINTAIN A REGISTRY IDENTIFYING FIREARM OWNERSHIP.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-12-403 as
follows:
18-12-403. Record - failure to make - penalty.
Every individual, firm, or corporation A DEALER who fails to keep
the record required pursuant to section 18-12-402 or section 18-12-111.5
(7)(b), or who refuses to exhibit the record when requested by a police
PEACE officer, and any purchaser, lessee, or exchanger of a pistol or
revolver FIREARM who, in connection with the making of such THE record,
gives false information, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-406, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(VIII), (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), and (6); and add
(2.5) and (4.5) as follows:
18-12-406. Requirements for firearms dealers - training -
securing firearms - sale outside of business hours prohibited - rules -
penalty.
(1) (a) The department shall develop training or approve training
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

courses provided by other entities for dealers, RESPONSIBLE PERSONS, and
dealers' employees. The training must be available in an online format and
include an examination with at least twenty questions derived from the
course material and intended to confirm that a course participant
understands the information covered in the course. The department, or other
trainer conducting the training, shall give a COURSE participant who answers
at least seventy percent of the examination questions correctly a printable
certificate of completion that is valid for one year after the date of
completion. The training must include instruction regarding the following:
(VIII) Effectively Teaching consumers rules of firearm safety,
including the safe handling and storage of firearms; and
(b) A dealer, AND EACH RESPONSIBLE PERSON OF THE DEALER WHO,
IN THE COURSE OF THEIR DUTIES, HANDLES FIREARMS; PROCESSES THE SALE,
LOAN, OR TRANSFER OF FIREARMS; OR OTHERWISE HAS ACCESS TO FIREARMS,
shall, within thirty days after the date the permit is issued and annually
thereafter, complete a training course developed or approved by the
department pursuant to this subsection (1).
(c) (I) An employee of a dealer who, in the course of the employee's
duties, handles firearms; processes the sale, loan, or transfer of firearms; or
otherwise has access to firearms shall, within thirty days after the
employee's first day of work for the dealer and annually thereafter, complete
a training course developed or approved by the department pursuant to this
subsection (1). An employee who, in the course of the employee's duties,
handles firearms; processes the sale, loan, or transfer of firearms; or
otherwise has access to firearms, who is employed by a dealer on July 1,
2025, shall complete the employee's first training course no later than thirty
days after July 1, 2025.
(II) A dealer shall maintain the training records of EACH
RESPONSIBLE PERSON OF THE DEALER AND each employee and shall make
the records available to the department during an on-site inspection of the
dealer's place of business.
(2) A dealer shall not conduct business or store firearms at the
dealer's place of business unless:
(a) The dealer secures each firearm, except when the firearm is
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

being shown to a customer, repaired, or otherwise worked on, in a manner
that prevents unauthorized use of the firearm. Securing a firearm may
include keeping the firearm in a locked container, including a locked
display case; properly installing a locking device on the firearm; or, if the
firearm is a personalized firearm, activating the safety characteristics of the
firearm.
(b) THE DEALER SECURES EACH LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE IN THE
DEALER'S POSSESSION BEHIND A COUNTER, IN AN ENCLOSED AND LOCKED
DISPLAY CASE, OR IN A LOCKED ROOM INACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC, EXCEPT
WHEN THE LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE IS BEING SHOWN TO A CUSTOMER
PERMITTED TO PURCHASE A LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 18-12-302 OR IS BEING REPAIRED OR OTHERWISE WORKED ON; AND
(c) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEALER HAS IMPLEMENTED
SECURITY MEASURES IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT'S RULES
ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND AS SET
FORTH IN THE DEALER'S COMPREHENSIVE SECURITY PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2.5)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(2.5) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ADOPT RULES REQUIRING SECURITY MEASURES FOR A DEALER'S PLACE OF
BUSINESS TO PROTECT PERSONNEL, CUSTOMERS, FIREARMS, AND
AMMUNITION, AND TO PREVENT UNAUTHORIZED ENTRY. THE DEPARTMENT
MAY CONSIDER, AND SET DIFFERENT STANDARDS BASED ON, THE
CHARACTERISTICS OF A PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(b) A DEALER SHALL SUBMIT A COMPREHENSIVE SECURITY PLAN TO
THE DEPARTMENT THAT DEMONSTRATES THE SECURITY MEASURES THAT THE
DEALER WILL IMPLEMENT TO COMPLY WITH THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (2.5). THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE FEEDBACK TO
A DEALER ON A SUBMITTED PLAN. IF A DEALER UPDATES ITS PLAN AT ANY
TIME, THE DEALER SHALL SUBMIT THE UPDATED PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(4.5) A DEALER SHALL REPORT THE THEFT OR LOSS OF A FIREARM
FROM THE DEALER'S INVENTORY TO THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN FORTY-EIGHT
HOURS AFTER LEARNING OF THE THEFT OR LOSS.
(6) A violation of any provision of this section by a dealer is a
violation of state law concerning the sale of firearms and is subject to the
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

penalties described in section 18-12-401.5 (7).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-407, amend (1)
introductory portion as follows:
18-12-407. Dealer employee requirements - background check
- penalty.
(1) A dealer shall not employ OR CONTRACT WITH a person who, in
the course of the person's duties AS AN EMPLOYEE OR CONTRACTOR, handles
firearms; processes the sale, loan, or transfer of firearms; or otherwise has
access to firearms, AND who:
SECTION 7. Applicability. (1) Section 18-12-401.5 (3), Colorado
Revised Statutes, as amended in section 2 of this act, applies to applications
submitted on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) Section 18-12-402, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
section 3 of this act, applies to transactions conducted on or after the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 8. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1126

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1126